Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle A. Selection of Presidential Electors by Political Parties.

§ 23-15-771.
Selection of electors at state convention for place on primary election ballot.

At the state convention, a slate of electors composed of the number of electors allotted to this state, which said electors announce a clearly expressed design and purpose to support the candidates for President and Vice-President of the national political party with which the said party of this state has had an affiliation and identity of purpose heretofore, shall be designated and selected for a place upon the primary election ballot to be held as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 240, eff from and after January 1, 1987.